Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.020

Applicability.

(1) This chapter applies to a collaborative law participation agreement that meets the requirements of RCW 7.77.030 signed on or after July 28, 2013.

(2) The use of collaborative law applies only to matters that would be resolved in civil court and may not be used to resolve matters in criminal cases.

[ 2013 c 119 s 3.]